Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 8

Procurement Specifications and Scopes of Work

12-3-801. Specifications and scopes of work to permit open and competitive soliciting.

Whenever possible, all procurement specifications and scopes of work for goods and services to be purchased by the central procurement office or state agencies shall be worded or designed to permit open and competitive soliciting for the supplying of the goods or services to which they apply and all proprietary specifications and scopes of work shall be developed in accordance with rules of the central procurement office approved by the procurement commission.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 41.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to part 11 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-502 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to title 12, ch. 3, part 11 and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-802. Adoption and application of standard specifications and scopes of work.

It is the duty of all state agencies to furnish to the chief procurement officer recommended specifications for all goods and services required and to be required by such state agencies. It is the duty of the chief procurement officer to canvas the recommended specifications and either approve or modify the standard specifications and scopes of work so recommended, subject to the policy and criteria of the procurement commission. All standard specifications and scopes of work shall remain on file in the central procurement office and shall be posted on the central procurement office's website. Each standard specification adopted for any good or service shall fit, insofar as possible, the requirements of the majority of the state agencies that use the same.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 42.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to part 11 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-501 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to title 12, ch. 3, part 11 and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-803. Changes and additions to standard specifications.

After the approval and adoption of standard specifications in the manner provided in §12-3-802, changes in, alterations to, modifications of, or additions to such standard specifications may be made in accordance with rules or policy of the central procurement office as approved by the procurement commission.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 43.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to part 11 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-503 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to title 12, ch. 3, part 11 and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-804. Standard specifications preferred — Procedure for exceptions.

The chief procurement officer shall make use of standard specifications whenever practicable. Goods and services purchased without standard specifications shall be made in accordance with policies and criteria established by the procurement commission.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 44.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to part 11 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-504 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to title 12, ch. 3, part 11 and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-805. Requisition of goods and services for which no standard adopted.

Whenever any department, institution, or agency of state government requisitions any goods or services for which a standard specification has not been adopted and approved, it shall be accompanied by or contain a recommended specification for such goods or services.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 45.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to part 11 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-505 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to title 12, ch. 3, part 11 and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-806. Specifications for office goods — Biennial report.

Whenever the chief procurement officer determines it to be advantageous, then specifications for office goods to be purchased by the state agencies shall be worded or designed so as to permit remanufactured office goods to be eligible for purchase. Such specifications may provide that remanufactured office materials, supplies and equipment be comparable in use and quality to new or currently manufactured office materials, supplies and equipment.

The chief procurement officer shall prepare and submit to the governor, the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives, the chairs of the committees on government operations, and the procurement commission, a biennial report concerning the purchase of remanufactured office goods. Such report shall include the amount and frequency of such purchases, the cost savings realized by the state as a result of such purchases, and any remaining issues or areas for improvement.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 46.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to part 11 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-509 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to title 12, ch. 3, part 11 and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-807. Standard specifications for lubricating motor oil — Authorized purchases — List of businesses distributing re-refined or recycled oil.

Standard specifications adopted for lubricating motor oil for competitive solicitations to be let by the central procurement office, or by the appropriate purchasing agencies for any political subdivision of the state, shall be prescribed to include re-refined or recycled lubricating motor oil. Such specifications may exclude re-refined or recycled lubricating motor oil for circumstances or equipment that require specialized treatment, upon submission of documented evidence to the procurement commission or the appropriate purchasing agency of the political subdivision to substantiate each such claim for exclusion.

Standard specifications adopted for lubricating motor oil for competitive solicitations to be let by any state agency or by any political subdivision of the state, shall be prescribed to include re-refined or recycled lubricating motor oil. Such specifications may exclude re-refined or recycled lubricating motor oil for circumstances or equipment that require specialized treatment, upon submission of documented evidence to the appropriate departmental, institutional or agency head to substantiate each such claim for exclusion. The requirements of this section shall not be construed to prohibit such state agency from purchasing and contracting for the purchase of such re-refined or recycled lubricating motor oil through the central procurement office or through the appropriate local purchasing agency.

Any nonprofit corporation receiving funding from the state or contracting with any department, institution, or agency of state government or political subdivision of the state to provide services to the public, shall be authorized to purchase and contract for the purchase of such re-refined or recycled lubricating motor oil as provided in this section through the central procurement office under this chapter or through the appropriate local purchasing agency.

The central procurement office shall compile and publish a list of business entities that commercially distribute re-refined or recycled lubricating motor oil that complies with the standard specifications adopted by the central procurement office pursuant to this section. The central procurement office shall make such list available to the various entities and political subdivisions of state government. The central procurement office shall mail such list to the chief executive of each county and each municipality.

Prior to accepting competitive responses for a contract concerning lubricating motor oil, a county or municipality shall notify each business entity on the central procurement office's list of relevant facts concerning such proposed contract.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 47.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to part 11 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-531 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to title 12, ch. 3, part 11 and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-808. Specifications for purchases of chemical products.

Specifications for purchases of chemical products pursuant to this chapter shall require that the manufacturer of the chemical products create and maintain a material safety data sheet (MSDS) for such chemical products on the national MSDSSEARCH repository or the manufacturer's website so that the information can be accessed by means of the internet. A site operated by or on behalf of the manufacturer or a relevant trade association is acceptable so long as the information is freely accessible to the public. In lieu of posting a MSDS on MSDSSEARCH, a respondent shall include the manufacturer's universal resource locator (URL) for their MSDS in the response proposal or purchase order.

The chief procurement officer shall post on the chief procurement officer's website the URL for MSDSSEARCH.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 48.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 8, §§12-3-801 —12-3-813, was transferred to part 11 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 64-67, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-217 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 8 to title 12, ch. 3, part 11 and enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.